Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.aff
FLAG long
SFX f4 Y 47
SFX f4 ir ir/n'q'd'l'm't's' ir is:infi
SFX f4 ir issant/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:ppre
SFX f4 ir is/n'q'j'l'm't' ir is:ipre is:1sg
SFX f4 ir is/n'q'l'm't' ir is:ipre is:2sg
SFX f4 ir it/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:ipre is:3sg
SFX f4 ir issons/n'q'l't' ir is:ipre is:1pl
SFX f4 ir issez/n'q'l'm' ir is:ipre is:2pl
SFX f4 ir issent/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:ipre is:3pl
SFX f4 ir issais/n'q'j'l'm't' ir is:iimp is:1sg
SFX f4 ir issais/n'q'l'm't' ir is:iimp is:2sg
SFX f4 ir issait/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:iimp is:3sg
SFX f4 ir issions/n'q'l't' ir is:iimp is:1pl
SFX f4 ir issiez/n'q'l'm' ir is:iimp is:2pl
SFX f4 ir issaient/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:iimp is:3pl
SFX f4 ir is/n'q'j'l'm't' ir is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX f4 ir is/n'q'l'm't' ir is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX f4 ir it/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX f4 ir îmes/n'q'l't' ir is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX f4 ir îtes/n'q'l'm' ir is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX f4 ir irent/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX f4 ir irai/n'q'j'l'm't' ir is:ifut is:1sg
SFX f4 ir iras/n'q'l'm't' ir is:ifut is:2sg
SFX f4 ir ira/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:ifut is:3sg
SFX f4 ir irons/n'q'l't' ir is:ifut is:1pl
SFX f4 ir irez/n'q'l'm' ir is:ifut is:2pl
SFX f4 ir iront/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:ifut is:3pl
SFX f4 ir irais/n'q'j'l'm't' ir is:cond is:1sg
SFX f4 ir irais/n'q'l'm't' ir is:cond is:2sg
SFX f4 ir irait/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:cond is:3sg
SFX f4 ir irions/n'q'l't' ir is:cond is:1pl
SFX f4 ir iriez/n'q'l'm' ir is:cond is:2pl
SFX f4 ir iraient/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:cond is:3pl
SFX f4 ir isse/n'j'l'm't' ir is:spre is:1sg
SFX f4 ir isses/n'l'm't' ir is:spre is:2sg
SFX f4 ir isse/n'l'm't's' ir is:spre is:3sg
SFX f4 ir issions/n'l't' ir is:spre is:1pl
SFX f4 ir issiez/n'l'm' ir is:spre is:2pl
SFX f4 ir issent/n'l'm't's' ir is:spre is:3pl
SFX f4 ir isse/n'q'j'l'm't' ir is:simp is:1sg
SFX f4 ir isses/n'q'l'm't' ir is:simp is:2sg
SFX f4 ir ît/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:simp is:3sg
SFX f4 ir issions/n'q'l't' ir is:simp is:1pl
SFX f4 ir issiez/n'q'l'm' ir is:simp is:2pl
SFX f4 ir issent/n'q'l'm't's' ir is:simp is:3pl
SFX f4 ir is/n'l'm't' ir is:impe is:2sg
SFX f4 ir issons/n'l' ir is:impe is:1pl
SFX f4 ir issez/n'l'm' ir is:impe is:2pl
SFX f5 Y 47
SFX f5 ir ir/n'q'd'm't's' ir is:infi
SFX f5 ir issant/n'q'm't's' ir is:ppre
SFX f5 ir is/n'j'm't' ir is:ipre is:1sg
SFX f5 ir is/n'm't' ir is:ipre is:2sg
SFX f5 ir it/n'q'm't's' ir is:ipre is:3sg
SFX f5 ir issons/n't' ir is:ipre is:1pl
SFX f5 ir issez/n'm' ir is:ipre is:2pl
SFX f5 ir issent/n'q'm't's' ir is:ipre is:3pl
SFX f5 ir issais/n'j'm't' ir is:iimp is:1sg
SFX f5 ir issais/n'm't' ir is:iimp is:2sg
SFX f5 ir issait/n'q'm't's' ir is:iimp is:3sg
SFX f5 ir issions/n't' ir is:iimp is:1pl
SFX f5 ir issiez/n'm' ir is:iimp is:2pl
SFX f5 ir issaient/n'q'm't's' ir is:iimp is:3pl
SFX f5 ir is/n'j'm't' ir is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX f5 ir is/n'm't' ir is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX f5 ir it/n'q'm't's' ir is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX f5 ir îmes/n't' ir is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX f5 ir îtes/n'm' ir is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX f5 ir irent/n'q'm't's' ir is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX f5 ir irai/n'j'm't' ir is:ifut is:1sg
SFX f5 ir iras/n'm't' ir is:ifut is:2sg
SFX f5 ir ira/n'q'm't's' ir is:ifut is:3sg
SFX f5 ir irons/n't' ir is:ifut is:1pl
SFX f5 ir irez/n'm' ir is:ifut is:2pl
SFX f5 ir iront/n'q'm't's' ir is:ifut is:3pl
SFX f5 ir irais/n'j'm't' ir is:cond is:1sg
SFX f5 ir irais/n'm't' ir is:cond is:2sg
SFX f5 ir irait/n'q'm't's' ir is:cond is:3sg
SFX f5 ir irions/n't' ir is:cond is:1pl
SFX f5 ir iriez/n'm' ir is:cond is:2pl
SFX f5 ir iraient/n'q'm't's' ir is:cond is:3pl
SFX f5 ir isse/n'j'm't' ir is:spre is:1sg
SFX f5 ir isses/n'm't' ir is:spre is:2sg
SFX f5 ir isse/n'q'm't's' ir is:spre is:3sg
SFX f5 ir issions/n't' ir is:spre is:1pl
SFX f5 ir issiez/n'm' ir is:spre is:2pl
SFX f5 ir issent/n'q'm't's' ir is:spre is:3pl
SFX f5 ir isse/n'j'm't' ir is:simp is:1sg
SFX f5 ir isses/n'm't' ir is:simp is:2sg
SFX f5 ir ît/n'q'm't's' ir is:simp is:3sg
SFX f5 ir issions/n't' ir is:simp is:1pl
SFX f5 ir issiez/n'm' ir is:simp is:2pl
SFX f5 ir issent/n'q'm't's' ir is:simp is:3pl
SFX f5 ir is/n'm' ir is:impe is:2sg
SFX f5 ir issons/n' ir is:impe is:1pl
SFX f5 ir issez/n'm' ir is:impe is:2pl
SFX fA N 51
SFX fA aïr aïr aïr is:infi
SFX fA aïr aïssant aïr is:ppre
SFX fA aïr aï aïr is:ppas is:mas
SFX fA aïr aïs aïr is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX fA aïr aïe aïr is:ppas is:fem
SFX fA aïr aïes aïr is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX fA aïr ais aïr is:ipre is:1sg
SFX fA aïr ais aïr is:ipre is:2sg
SFX fA aïr ait aïr is:ipre is:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïssons aïr is:ipre is:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssez aïr is:ipre is:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïssent aïr is:ipre is:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïssais aïr is:iimp is:1sg
SFX fA aïr aïssais aïr is:iimp is:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïssait aïr is:iimp is:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïssions aïr is:iimp is:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssiez aïr is:iimp is:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïssaient aïr is:iimp is:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïs aïr is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX fA aïr aïs aïr is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX fA aïr aït aïr is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïmes aïr is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïtes aïr is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïrent aïr is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïrai aïr is:ifut is:1sg
SFX fA aïr aïras aïr is:ifut is:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïra aïr is:ifut is:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïrons aïr is:ifut is:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïrez aïr is:ifut is:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïront aïr is:ifut is:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïrais aïr is:cond is:1sg
SFX fA aïr aïrais aïr is:cond is:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïrait aïr is:cond is:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïrions aïr is:cond is:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïriez aïr is:cond is:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïraient aïr is:cond is:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïsse aïr is:spre is:1sg
SFX fA aïr aïsses aïr is:spre is:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïsse aïr is:spre is:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïssions aïr is:spre is:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssiez aïr is:spre is:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïssent aïr is:spre is:3pl
SFX fA aïr aïsse aïr is:simp is:1sg
SFX fA aïr aïsses aïr is:simp is:2sg
SFX fA aïr aït aïr is:simp is:3sg
SFX fA aïr aïssions aïr is:simp is:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssiez aïr is:simp is:2pl
SFX fA aïr aïssent aïr is:simp is:3pl
SFX fA aïr ais aïr is:impe is:2sg
SFX fA aïr aïssons aïr is:impe is:1pl
SFX fA aïr aïssez aïr is:impe is:2pl
SFX fB Y 36
SFX fB haïr haïr/s' aïr is:infi
SFX fB haïr haïssant/s' aïr is:ppre
SFX fB haïr haï aïr is:ppas is:mas
SFX fB haïr haïs aïr is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX fB haïr haïe aïr is:ppas is:fem
SFX fB haïr haïes aïr is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX fB haïr hait/s' aïr is:ipre is:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïssons aïr is:ipre is:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssez aïr is:ipre is:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïssent/s' aïr is:ipre is:3pl
SFX fB haïr haïssait/s' aïr is:iimp is:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïssions aïr is:iimp is:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssiez aïr is:iimp is:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïssaient/s' aïr is:iimp is:3pl
SFX fB haïr haït/s' aïr is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïmes aïr is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïtes aïr is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïrent/s' aïr is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX fB haïr haïra/s' aïr is:ifut is:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïrons aïr is:ifut is:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïrez aïr is:ifut is:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïront/s' aïr is:ifut is:3pl
SFX fB haïr haïrait/s' aïr is:cond is:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïrions aïr is:cond is:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïriez aïr is:cond is:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïraient/s' aïr is:cond is:3pl
SFX fB haïr haïsse/s' aïr is:spre is:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïssions aïr is:spre is:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssiez aïr is:spre is:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïssent/s' aïr is:spre is:3pl
SFX fB haïr haït/s' aïr is:simp is:3sg
SFX fB haïr haïssions aïr is:simp is:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssiez aïr is:simp is:2pl
SFX fB haïr haïssent/s' aïr is:simp is:3pl
SFX fB haïr haïssons-nous aïr is:impe is:1pl
SFX fB haïr haïssez-vous aïr is:impe is:2pl
