Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.dic
abâtardir/f4p+() po:v2tp
abêtir/f4p+() po:v2tp
abonnir/f4p+() po:v2tp
abrutir/f4p+() po:v2tp
accomplir/f4p+() po:v2tp
adoucir/f4p+() po:v2tp
affadir/f4p+() po:v2tp
affaiblir/f4p+() po:v2tp
affermir/f4p+() po:v2tp
affranchir/f4p+() po:v2tp
agrandir/f4p+() po:v2tp
aguerrir/f4p+() po:v2tp
aigrir/f4p+() po:v2itp
alanguir/f4p+() po:v2tp
alourdir/f4p+() po:v2tp
amaigrir/f4p+() po:v2tp
amincir/f4p+() po:v2itp
amoindrir/f4p+() po:v2tp
amollir/f4p+() po:v2tp
amortir/f4p+() po:v2tp
anéantir/f4p+() po:v2tp
anoblir/f4p+() po:v2tp
aplanir/f4p+() po:v2tp
aplatir/f4p+() po:v2tp
appauvrir/f4p+() po:v2tp
appesantir/f4p+() po:v2tp
applaudir/f4p+() po:v2itîp
approfondir/f4p+() po:v2tp
arrondir/f4p+() po:v2tp
assagir/f4p+() po:v2tp
asservir/f4p+() po:v2tp
assombrir/f4p+() po:v2tp
assortir/f4p+() po:v2tp
assoupir/f4p+() po:v2tp
assouplir/f4p+() po:v2tp
assourdir/f4p+() po:v2itp
assouvir/f4p+() po:v2tp
assujettir/f4p+() po:v2tp
attendrir/f4p+() po:v2tp
attiédir/f4p+() po:v2tp
avachir/f4p+() po:v2itp
aveulir/f4p+() po:v2tp
avilir/f4p+() po:v2tp
ébahir/f4p+() po:v2tp
ébaudir/f4p+() po:v2tp
éclaircir/f4p+() po:v2tp
élargir/f4p+() po:v2itp
embellir/f4p+() po:v2itp
emplir/f4p+() po:v2itp
endurcir/f4p+() po:v2tp
enfouir/f4p+() po:v2tp
engloutir/f4p+() po:v2tp
engourdir/f4p+() po:v2tp
enhardir/f4p+() po:v2tp
enlaidir/f4p+() po:v2itp
enorgueillir/f4p+() po:v2tp
enrichir/f4p+() po:v2tp
ensevelir/f4p+() po:v2tp
entrehaïr/fB() po:v2r
entre-haïr/fB() po:v2r
envieillir/f4p+() po:v2tp
épaissir/f4p+() po:v2itp
épanouir/f4p+() po:v2tp
établir/f4p+() po:v2tp
étourdir/f4p+() po:v2tp
étrécir/f4p+() po:v2tp
haïr/fA() po:v2itp
infléchir/f4p+() po:v2tp
investir/f4p+() po:v2itp
obéir/f5p+() po:v2î
obscurcir/f4p+() po:v2tp
ourdir/f4p+() po:v2tp
unir/f4p+() po:v2tp
